Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-92] Registration of existing stream
diversion works. Any person owning or operating a stream diversion works
within or outside of a water management area shall register such work with the
commission. Registration shall be on the forms provided by the commission.
Reporting requirements on the registration forms shall be reasonable. [L 1987,
c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next